District of Columbia statutes.
50-732

Prohibition on registering motor vehicles not in compliance.

The Mayor shall not register a motor vehicle that is subject to the provisions of this chapter if the motor vehicle does not comply with this chapter, or any rule promulgated under this chapter.

History

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-151, § 3, 55 DCR 3450